Utah statutes.
62A-15-1003.   Physician and provider responsibilities -- Provision of
services contrary to declaration -- Revocation.
(1)  Upon being presented with a declaration, a physician shall make the
declaration a part of the declarant's medical record.  When acting under
authority of a declaration, a physician shall comply with it to the fullest
extent possible, consistent with reasonable medical practice, the availability
of treatments requested, and applicable law.  If the physician or other
provider is unwilling at any time to comply with the declaration, the
physician or provider shall promptly notify the declarant and the attorney-in-
fact, and document the notification in the declarant's medical record.
(2)  A physician or provider may subject a declarant to intrusive treatment in
a manner contrary to the declarant's wishes, as expressed in a declaration for
mental health treatment if:
(a)  the declarant has been committed to the custody of a local mental health
authority in accordance with Part 6; or
(b)  in cases of emergency endangering life or health.
(3)  A declaration does not limit any authority provided in Part 6 to take a
person into custody, or admit or retain a person in the custody of a local
mental health authority.
(4)  A declaration may be revoked in whole or in part by the declarant at any
time so long as the declarant is not incapable.  That revocation is effective
when the declarant communicates the revocation to the attending physician or
other provider.  The attending physician or other provider shall note the
revocation as part of the declarant's medical record.
(5)  A physician who administers or does not administer mental health
treatment according to and in good faith reliance upon the validity of a
declaration is not subject to criminal prosecution, civil liability, or
professional disciplinary action resulting from a subsequent finding that a
declaration is invalid.
(6)  None of the following persons may serve as an attorney-in-fact or as
witnesses to the signing of a declaration:
(a)  the declarant's attending physician or mental health treatment provider,
or an employee of that physician or provider;
(b)  an employee of the division; or
(c)  an employee of a local mental health authority or any organization that
contracts with a local mental health authority.
(7)  An attorney-in-fact may withdraw by giving notice to the declarant.  If a
declarant is incapable, the attorney-in-fact may withdraw by giving notice to
the attending physician or provider.  The attending physician shall note the
withdrawal as part of the declarant's medical record.
